Vermont, session 2025-2026, S319.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 31 V.S.A. § 1209 is added to read:
§ 1209. LIMITED WAGERING EVENT PERMIT
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Adjusted gross receipts” means the gross receipts less winnings
paid to wagerers.
VT LEG #386106 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.319
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) “Limited wagering event permit” means a permit issued by the
Department of Liquor and Lottery that authorizes a wagering event operator to
hold a wagering event.
(3) “Wagering event” means an event not to exceed 72 hours in which
wagerers may participate in poker games or tournaments.
(4) “Wagering event operator” means a person who is the responsible
operator and administrator of a poker game or tournament.
(b) The Board of Liquor and Lottery is authorized to issue limited wagering
event permits to wagering event operators. A person may apply to the
Department of Liquor and Lottery to operate a single wagering event, at an
approved location, not to exceed 72 hours in duration. The Board shall not
issue more than five limited wagering event permits annually. The Board shall
not issue more than one limited wagering event permit to the same person in a
given calendar year.
(c) A wagering event operator shall be assessed a fee of $500.00 for a
limited wagering event permit.
(d) A wagering event operator shall submit an application on a form
adopted by the Board of Liquor and Lottery. A wagering event operator shall
submit the following information to the Department:
VT LEG #386106 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.319
2026 Page 3 of 4
(1) the names of all principals and key employees;
(2) the premises that will host the wagering event and security measures
that the wagering event operator will use for the event;
(3) a list of all jurisdictions where the wagering event operators or any
parent companies are currently authorized to conduct similar wagering events
or casino gaming; and
(4) the proposed number of players in the event and the measures taken
to ensure that players are over 18 years of age.
(e) The Board shall adopt procedures governing the review and
consideration of criminal background checks as a component of the permit
application review process. The procedures shall establish standards for
determining whether an applicant should not be selected as a wagering event
operator due to the criminal history of the applicant’s principals or other
individuals who control the operator applicant. The Department shall obtain a
copy of fingerprint-based Vermont criminal history records, out-of-state
criminal history records, and criminal history records from the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for each operator applicant, principal of an operator applicant,
and any individual who controls an operator applicant.
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, the Department may
accept third-party criminal background checks submitted by an operator
applicant, principal of an operator applicant, or any individual who controls an
VT LEG #386106 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.319
2026 Page 4 of 4
operator applicant in lieu of obtaining those records from the Vermont Crime
Information Center. The third-party background check shall:
(1) be conducted by a third-party consumer reporting agency or
background screening company that is in compliance with the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act; and
(2) include a multistate and multijurisdictional criminal record locator.
(g) The holder of a limited wagering event permit shall pay a tax of 35
percent of the adjusted gross receipts from the wagering event. The
Commissioner of Taxes is authorized to collect and administer the tax pursuant
to this section, and the tax shall be paid and collected in the same manner as an
income tax under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151. A licensee liable for the tax imposed
by this section shall remit to the Commissioner of Taxes a return and any other
information required by the Commissioner along with the tax due within 15
days after the end of the wagering event. The Commissioner shall deposit all
tax revenue collected pursuant to this section in the Education Fund established
in 16 V.S.A. § 4025.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386106 v.1